Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-306
Alternative
fuel, defined.

Alternative fuel includes electricity, solar power, and
any other source of energy not otherwise taxed under the motor fuel laws as
defined in section 66-712 which is used to power a motor vehicle. Alternative
fuel does not include motor vehicle fuel as defined in section 66-482, diesel
fuel as defined in section 66-482, or compressed fuel as defined in section
66-6,100.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 13.